Utah statutes.
10-3-914.   Police officers -- Authority.

(1)  Within the boundaries of the municipality, police officers have the same authority as deputy sheriffs, including at all times the authority to preserve the public peace, prevent crime, detect and arrest offenders, suppress riots, protect persons and property, remove nuisances existing in the public streets, roads, and highways, enforce every law relating to the suppression of offenses, and perform all duties required of them by ordinance or resolution.

(2)  This section is not a limitation of a police officer's statewide authority as otherwise provided by law.

